Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.050

Limitations.

All provisions of law relating to the limitations of personal actions shall apply to claims against the state, but the computation of time thereunder shall not begin until RCW 4.92.010 through 4.92.050 shall have become a law.

[ 1895 c 95 s 5; RRS s 890.]